Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-660
Combined tax or interest; adjustments; refunds.

If more than the correct amounts of combined tax or interest are collected, then, under rules and regulations made under section 48-607, proper adjustments with respect thereto shall be made, without interest, in connection with subsequent combined tax. If such adjustment cannot be made within a reasonable time, the commissioner shall refund the excess from the appropriate fund. Applications for adjustments or refunds shall be made within four years after the date of such overcollection.

Laws 1937, c. 108, § 14, p. 399;

Laws 1939, c. 56, § 11, p. 251;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 48-713;

R.S.1943, § 48-660;

Laws 1945, c. 115, § 7, p. 386;

Laws 1985, LB 339, § 41;

Laws 1994, LB 1337, § 18.